fst/nom_stems.lexc
! N75 — 44 entries
LEXICON N75_stems
  anktwei+N+Sg+Nom:anktwei  # ;
  perlānktwei+N+Sg+Nom:perlānktwei  # ;
  perlānktwei+N+Sg+Nom:perlānktwei  # ;
  artun+N+Sg+Nom:artun  # ;
  enartun+N+Sg+Nom:enartun  # ;
  aulānktun+N+Sg+Nom:aulānktun  # ;
  kāuktwei+N+Sg+Nom:kāuktwei  # ;
  kūmptwei+N+Sg+Nom:kūmptwei  # ;
  deīgtun+N+Sg+Nom:deīgtun  # ;
  dēngtun+N+Sg+Nom:dēngtun  # ;
  dērgtun+N+Sg+Nom:dērgtun  # ;
  erdērgtun+N+Sg+Nom:erdērgtun  # ;
  enlēztwei+N+Sg+Nom:enlēztwei  # ;
  entrentun+N+Sg+Nom:entrentun  # ;
  erlāngtun+N+Sg+Nom:erlāngtun  # ;
  etkūmptwei+N+Sg+Nom:etkūmptwei  # ;
  girtun+N+Sg+Nom:girtun  # ;
  pagirtun+N+Sg+Nom:pagirtun  # ;
  gnjaūztun+N+Sg+Nom:gnjaūztun  # ;
  izwektun+N+Sg+Nom:izwektun  # ;
  izwektun+N+Sg+Nom:izwektun  # ;
  krāktwei+N+Sg+Nom:krāktwei  # ;
  kwīktwei+N+Sg+Nom:kwīktwei  # ;
  kwīrktwei+N+Sg+Nom:kwīrktwei  # ;
  kānktun+N+Sg+Nom:kānktun  # ;
  kūmptwei+N+Sg+Nom:kūmptwei  # ;
  lānktun+N+Sg+Nom:lānktun  # ;
  lēztwei+N+Sg+Nom:lēztwei  # ;
  pralēztwei+N+Sg+Nom:pralēztwei  # ;
  pralēztwei+N+Sg+Nom:pralēztwei  # ;
  meīgtun+N+Sg+Nom:meīgtun  # ;
  māuktun+N+Sg+Nom:māuktun  # ;
  pertraūktun+N+Sg+Nom:pertraūktun  # ;
  pīktwei+N+Sg+Nom:pīktwei  # ;
  sentēlktun+N+Sg+Nom:sentēlktun  # ;
  sprengtwei+N+Sg+Nom:sprengtwei  # ;
  stengtun+N+Sg+Nom:stengtun  # ;
  tengtun+N+Sg+Nom:tengtun  # ;
  teīktun+N+Sg+Nom:teīktun  # ;
  trintwei+N+Sg+Nom:trintwei  # ;
  tēlktun+N+Sg+Nom:tēlktun  # ;
  wektwei+N+Sg+Nom:wektwei  # ;
  zwengtwei+N+Sg+Nom:zwengtwei  # ;
  šnurgtwei+N+Sg+Nom:šnurgtwei  # ;

! N76 — 14 entries
LEXICON N76_stems
  aupūstun+N+Sg+Nom:aupūstun  # ;
  engnestun+N+Sg+Nom:engnestun  # ;
  ernērstwei+N+Sg+Nom:ernērstwei  # ;
  etgnestun+N+Sg+Nom:etgnestun  # ;
  etwērstun+N+Sg+Nom:etwērstun  # ;
  gnestun+N+Sg+Nom:gnestun  # ;
  gnestun+N+Sg+Nom:gnestun  # ;
  pagnestun+N+Sg+Nom:pagnestun  # ;
  kūnstun+N+Sg+Nom:kūnstun  # ;
  pakūnstun+N+Sg+Nom:pakūnstun  # ;
  mēnstun+N+Sg+Nom:mēnstun  # ;
  nērstwei+N+Sg+Nom:nērstwei  # ;
  pūstun+N+Sg+Nom:pūstun  # ;
  wērstun+N+Sg+Nom:wērstun  # ;

! N77 — 12 entries
LEXICON N77_stems
  augraūstun+N+Sg+Nom:augraūstun  # ;
  aūstun+N+Sg+Nom:aūstun  # ;
  graūstun+N+Sg+Nom:graūstun  # ;
  izgraūstun+N+Sg+Nom:izgraūstun  # ;
  gēistwei+N+Sg+Nom:gēistwei  # ;
  izlaīstun+N+Sg+Nom:izlaīstun  # ;
  izlaīstun+N+Sg+Nom:izlaīstun  # ;
  laīstun+N+Sg+Nom:laīstun  # ;
  palaīstun+N+Sg+Nom:palaīstun  # ;
  palaīstun+N+Sg+Nom:palaīstun  # ;
  perlaīstun+N+Sg+Nom:perlaīstun  # ;
  zēistun+N+Sg+Nom:zēistun  # ;

! N79 — 6 entries
LEXICON N79_stems
  autēnstun+N+Sg+Nom:autēnstun  # ;
  iztēnstun+N+Sg+Nom:iztēnstun  # ;
  sentēnstun+N+Sg+Nom:sentēnstun  # ;
  pāstun+N+Sg+Nom:pāstun  # ;
  tēnstun+N+Sg+Nom:tēnstun  # ;
  wōstun+N+Sg+Nom:wōstun  # ;

! N81 — 19 entries
LEXICON N81_stems
  zārtun+N+Sg+Nom:zārtun  # ;
  augertun+N+Sg+Nom:augertun  # ;
  auwertun+N+Sg+Nom:auwertun  # ;
  ebstegtun+N+Sg+Nom:ebstegtun  # ;
  ertwei+N+Sg+Nom:ertwei  # ;
  etspertwei+N+Sg+Nom:etspertwei  # ;
  spertwei+N+Sg+Nom:spertwei  # ;
  swērtwei+N+Sg+Nom:swērtwei  # ;
  etswērtun+N+Sg+Nom:etswērtun  # ;
  etwertun+N+Sg+Nom:etwertun  # ;
  gertun+N+Sg+Nom:gertun  # ;
  pragertun+N+Sg+Nom:pragertun  # ;
  kurtun+N+Sg+Nom:kurtun  # ;
  lektwei+N+Sg+Nom:lektwei  # ;
  perswērtun+N+Sg+Nom:perswērtun  # ;
  spertun+N+Sg+Nom:spertun  # ;
  stegtun+N+Sg+Nom:stegtun  # ;
  stēntwei+N+Sg+Nom:stēntwei  # ;
  swērtun+N+Sg+Nom:swērtun  # ;

! N82 — 3 entries
LEXICON N82_stems
  irtun+N+Sg+Nom:irtun  # ;
  patirtun+N+Sg+Nom:patirtun  # ;
  tirtun+N+Sg+Nom:tirtun  # ;

! N83 — 4 entries
LEXICON N83_stems
  audumtun+N+Sg+Nom:audumtun  # ;
  burtwei+N+Sg+Nom:burtwei  # ;
  dumtwei+N+Sg+Nom:dumtwei  # ;
  izdumtun+N+Sg+Nom:izdumtun  # ;

! N84 — 3 entries
LEXICON N84_stems
  justun+N+Sg+Nom:justun  # ;
  prajustun+N+Sg+Nom:prajustun  # ;
  preijustwei+N+Sg+Nom:preijustwei  # ;

! N86 — 8 entries
LEXICON N86_stems
  engnāstun+N+Sg+Nom:engnāstun  # ;
  gnāstun+N+Sg+Nom:gnāstun  # ;
  krāmstun+N+Sg+Nom:krāmstun  # ;
  kīrstun+N+Sg+Nom:kīrstun  # ;
  prakīrstun+N+Sg+Nom:prakīrstun  # ;
  praskīrstun+N+Sg+Nom:praskīrstun  # ;
  senkīrstun+N+Sg+Nom:senkīrstun  # ;
  skustun+N+Sg+Nom:skustun  # ;

! N87 — 25 entries
LEXICON N87_stems
  aukanstun+N+Sg+Nom:aukanstun  # ;
  auskrāistwei+N+Sg+Nom:auskrāistwei  # ;
  auskēnstwei+N+Sg+Nom:auskēnstwei  # ;
  bastun+N+Sg+Nom:bastun  # ;
  embastun+N+Sg+Nom:embastun  # ;
  brenstwei+N+Sg+Nom:brenstwei  # ;
  brestwei+N+Sg+Nom:brestwei  # ;
  dastun+N+Sg+Nom:dastun  # ;
  enkanstun+N+Sg+Nom:enkanstun  # ;
  etkestun+N+Sg+Nom:etkestun  # ;
  glāstun+N+Sg+Nom:glāstun  # ;
  izskrāistwei+N+Sg+Nom:izskrāistwei  # ;
  kanstun+N+Sg+Nom:kanstun  # ;
  preikanstun+N+Sg+Nom:preikanstun  # ;
  kestun+N+Sg+Nom:kestun  # ;
  lāistun+N+Sg+Nom:lāistun  # ;
  perpēstun+N+Sg+Nom:perpēstun  # ;
  perskrāistwei+N+Sg+Nom:perskrāistwei  # ;
  pēstun+N+Sg+Nom:pēstun  # ;
  preipēstun+N+Sg+Nom:preipēstun  # ;
  preiskrāistwei+N+Sg+Nom:preiskrāistwei  # ;
  senskrāistwei+N+Sg+Nom:senskrāistwei  # ;
  skrāistwei+N+Sg+Nom:skrāistwei  # ;
  skēnstwei+N+Sg+Nom:skēnstwei  # ;
  snukstwei+N+Sg+Nom:snukstwei  # ;

! N88 — 2 entries
LEXICON N88_stems
  gestwei+N+Sg+Nom:gestwei  # ;
  kāistun+N+Sg+Nom:kāistun  # ;

! N89 — 31 entries
LEXICON N89_stems
  austebtwei+N+Sg+Nom:austebtwei  # ;
  dribtwei+N+Sg+Nom:dribtwei  # ;
  dubtwei+N+Sg+Nom:dubtwei  # ;
  ebtiktun+N+Sg+Nom:ebtiktun  # ;
  ebtiktwei+N+Sg+Nom:ebtiktwei  # ;
  enjuktwei+N+Sg+Nom:enjuktwei  # ;
  ensaltwei+N+Sg+Nom:ensaltwei  # ;
  enstebtwei+N+Sg+Nom:enstebtwei  # ;
  ersaltwei+N+Sg+Nom:ersaltwei  # ;
  jugtun+N+Sg+Nom:jugtun  # ;
  senjugtun+N+Sg+Nom:senjugtun  # ;
  juktwei+N+Sg+Nom:juktwei  # ;
  kniptwei+N+Sg+Nom:kniptwei  # ;
  laztwei+N+Sg+Nom:laztwei  # ;
  liptwei+N+Sg+Nom:liptwei  # ;
  stiptwei+N+Sg+Nom:stiptwei  # ;
  mīztwei+N+Sg+Nom:mīztwei  # ;
  paliktwei+N+Sg+Nom:paliktwei  # ;
  pasaltwei+N+Sg+Nom:pasaltwei  # ;
  pertiktwei+N+Sg+Nom:pertiktwei  # ;
  preisaltwei+N+Sg+Nom:preisaltwei  # ;
  preitektwei+N+Sg+Nom:preitektwei  # ;
  krektwei+N+Sg+Nom:krektwei  # ;
  saltwei+N+Sg+Nom:saltwei  # ;
  sektwei+N+Sg+Nom:sektwei  # ;
  skrabtwei+N+Sg+Nom:skrabtwei  # ;
  stebtwei+N+Sg+Nom:stebtwei  # ;
  strigtwei+N+Sg+Nom:strigtwei  # ;
  tektwei+N+Sg+Nom:tektwei  # ;
  tiktwei+N+Sg+Nom:tiktwei  # ;
  truptwei+N+Sg+Nom:truptwei  # ;

! N90 — 5 entries
LEXICON N90_stems
  grustwei+N+Sg+Nom:grustwei  # ;
  bustwei+N+Sg+Nom:bustwei  # ;
  etbustwei+N+Sg+Nom:etbustwei  # ;
  engrustwei+N+Sg+Nom:engrustwei  # ;
  gestwei+N+Sg+Nom:gestwei  # ;

! N91 — 2 entries
LEXICON N91_stems
  dustwei+N+Sg+Nom:dustwei  # ;
  sustwei+N+Sg+Nom:sustwei  # ;

! N92 — 31 entries
LEXICON N92_stems
  alktwei+N+Sg+Nom:alktwei  # ;
  sprāgtwei+N+Sg+Nom:sprāgtwei  # ;
  ebspēgtun+N+Sg+Nom:ebspēgtun  # ;
  enlīgtwei+N+Sg+Nom:enlīgtwei  # ;
  ensentwei+N+Sg+Nom:ensentwei  # ;
  enwārgtwei+N+Sg+Nom:enwārgtwei  # ;
  gurtwei+N+Sg+Nom:gurtwei  # ;
  springtwei+N+Sg+Nom:springtwei  # ;
  iznirtwei+N+Sg+Nom:iznirtwei  # ;
  nirtwei+N+Sg+Nom:nirtwei  # ;
  panirtwei+N+Sg+Nom:panirtwei  # ;
  swirtwei+N+Sg+Nom:swirtwei  # ;
  izlīnktwei+N+Sg+Nom:izlīnktwei  # ;
  iznīktwei+N+Sg+Nom:iznīktwei  # ;
  līgtwei+N+Sg+Nom:līgtwei  # ;
  līnktwei+N+Sg+Nom:līnktwei  # ;
  līnktwei+N+Sg+Nom:līnktwei  # ;
  senlīnktwei+N+Sg+Nom:senlīnktwei  # ;
  mīrktwei+N+Sg+Nom:mīrktwei  # ;
  nīktwei+N+Sg+Nom:nīktwei  # ;
  pakwēlptwei+N+Sg+Nom:pakwēlptwei  # ;
  persentwei+N+Sg+Nom:persentwei  # ;
  pratārtwei+N+Sg+Nom:pratārtwei  # ;
  rūgtwei+N+Sg+Nom:rūgtwei  # ;
  sentwei+N+Sg+Nom:sentwei  # ;
  sliktwei+N+Sg+Nom:sliktwei  # ;
  spēgtun+N+Sg+Nom:spēgtun  # ;
  spēgtwei+N+Sg+Nom:spēgtwei  # ;
  sīrptwei+N+Sg+Nom:sīrptwei  # ;
  tīrptwei+N+Sg+Nom:tīrptwei  # ;
  wilgtwei+N+Sg+Nom:wilgtwei  # ;
